Utah statutes.
20A-1-306.   Electronic signatures prohibited.

Notwithstanding Title 46, Chapter 4, Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, and Subsections 68-3-12(1)(e) and 68-3-12.5(24) and (33), an electronic signature may not be used to sign a petition to:

(1)  qualify a ballot proposition for the ballot under Chapter 7, Issues Submitted to the Voters;

(2)  organize and register a political party under Chapter 8, Political Party Formation and Procedures; or

(3)  qualify a candidate for the ballot under Chapter 9, Candidate Qualifications and Nominating Procedures.



Enacted by Chapter 17, 2011 General Session

